Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5341.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 227. (1) A person shall not carry a dagger, dirk, stiletto, a double-edged nonfolding stabbing instrument of any length, or any other dangerous weapon, except a hunting knife adapted and carried as such, a hunting knife, concealed on or about his or her that person, or whether concealed or otherwise in any vehicle operated or occupied by the person, except in his or her that person's dwelling house, place of business, or on other land possessed by the person. (2) A person shall not carry a pistol concealed on or about his or her that person, or, whether concealed or otherwise, in a vehicle operated or occupied by the person, except in his or her that person's dwelling house, place of business, or on other land possessed by the person, without a license to carry the pistol as provided by law and if licensed, shall not carry the pistol in a place or manner inconsistent with any restrictions upon such license. (3) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), a person who violates this section is guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years , or by a fine of not more than $2,500.00. (4) A person who violates subsection (2) for the first time is responsible for a state civil infraction and is subject to a civil fine of $330.00 if all of the following apply: (a) The person's concealed pistol license issued under section 5b of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.425b, expired not more than 1 year before the date of the violation. (b) The person is eligible to obtain a concealed pistol license under section 5b of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.425b. (5) A state civil infraction issued under subsection (4) does not authorize a peace officer to seize and retain a firearm in connection with the state civil infraction.